Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.600

Report to shareholders.

If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under RCW 23B.08.510, 23B.08.520, 23B.08.530, 23B.08.540, or 23B.08.560 in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall report the indemnification or advance in the form of a notice to the shareholders delivered with or before the notice of the next shareholders' meeting.

[ 2002 c 297 s 32; 1989 c 165 s 115.]